New York, session 2025-2026, A10487.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 146 of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 274 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. a. The following persons shall be authorized to visit at pleasure 5 all correctional facilities: The governor and lieutenant-governor, 6 commissioner of general services, secretary of state, comptroller and 7 attorney-general, members of the commission of correction, members of 8 the legislature and their accompanying staff and any employee of the 9 department as requested by the member of the legislature if the member 10 requests to be so accompanied, provided that such request does not 11 impact upon the department's ability to supervise, manage and control 12 its facilities as determined by the commissioner, judges of the court of 13 appeals, supreme court and county judges, district attorneys and every 14 clergyman or minister, as such terms are defined in section two of the 15 religious corporations law, having charge of a congregation in the coun- 16 ty wherein any such facility is situated. No other person not otherwise 17 authorized by law shall be permitted to enter a correctional facility 18 except by authority of the commissioner of correction under such regu- 19 lations as the commissioner shall prescribe. 20 b. The department shall provide to all individuals visiting a correc- 21 tional facility pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, a body- 22 worn camera to be worn for the duration of the visit and instruction on 23 how to operate such body-worn camera. A copy of any footage captured on 24 such body-worn camera shall be transmitted to the individual wearing the 25 camera, or their designee, within twenty-four hours of the end of their 26 visit. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 28 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14934-01-6